Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. State Trust Company Investments.

§ 81-27-5.101.
Securities.

A state trust company may invest its corporate funds in any type or character of equity or investment securities subject to the limitations provided by this section.

Unless the commissioner approves maintenance of a lesser amount in writing, a state trust company must invest and maintain an amount equal to at least forty percent (40%) of the state trust company’s capital under Section 81-27-4.106 in unencumbered cash, cash equivalents, and readily marketable securities.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the total investment in equity and investment securities of any one issuer, obligor, or maker, held by the state trust company for its own account, may not exceed an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the state trust company’s capital. The commissioner may authorize investments in excess of this limitation on written application if the commissioner concludes that:

The excess investment is not prohibited by other applicable law; and

The safety and soundness of the requesting state trust company is not adversely affected.

Securities that are offered and sold under 15 USCS Section 77d(5);

Mortgage related securities as defined in 15 USCS Section 78c(a), except that notwithstanding Section 347 of the Riegle Community Development and Regulatory Improvement Act of 1994, a note or obligation that is secured by a first lien on one or more parcels of real estate on which is located one or more commercial structures is subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this section;

Investment securities issued or guaranteed by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, the Federal National Mortgage Association, the Government National Mortgage Association, the Federal Agricultural Mortgage Association, or the Federal Farm Credit Banks Funding Corporation;

Investment securities issued or guaranteed by the North American Development Bank; or

Securities issued by a Federal Home Loan Bank.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, a state trust company may purchase for its own account, without limitation and subject only to the exercise of prudent judgment:

Bonds and other legally created general obligations of a state, an agency or political subdivision of a state, the United States, or an agency or instrumentality of the United States;

An investment security that this state, an agency or political subdivision of this state, the United States, or an agency or instrumentality of the United States has unconditionally agreed to purchase, insure, or guarantee;

Notwithstanding 15 USCS Section 77r-1(c), subsection (c) of this section applies to investments in small business related securities as defined by 15 USCS Section 78c(a).

The commissioner may adopt rules to establish limits, requirements, or exemptions other than those specified by this section for particular classes or categories of investment, or limit or expand investment authority for state trust companies for particular classes or categories of securities or other property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, §§ 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-5.102.
Transactions in state trust company shares or participation shares.

A state trust company may acquire its own shares or participation shares if:

The amount of its undivided profits is sufficient to fully absorb the acquisition of the shares or participation shares under regulatory accounting principles; or

The state trust company obtains the prior written approval of the commissioner.

A state trust company may acquire a lien upon its own shares or participation shares if:

The aggregate amount of indebtedness so secured is less than the amount of the state trust company’s undivided profits; or

The state trust company obtains the prior written approval of the commissioner.

Except with the prior written approval of the commissioner:

The state trust company may not hold its own shares or participation shares as treasury stock for more than two (2) years; and

A lien acquired under this section may not by its original terms extend for more than two (2) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-5.103.
Subsidiaries.

Except as otherwise provided by this article or rules or regulations adopted under this article, a state trust company may acquire or establish a subsidiary to conduct any activity that may lawfully be conducted through the form of organization chosen for the subsidiary.

A state trust company may not invest more than an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of its capital in a single subsidiary and may not invest an amount in excess of its restricted capital in all subsidiaries. The amount of a state trust company’s investment in a subsidiary is the total amount of the state trust company’s investment in equity or investment securities issued by its subsidiary and any loans and extensions of credit from the state trust company to its subsidiary. The commissioner may authorize investments in excess of these limitations on written application if the commissioner concludes that:

The excess investment is not prohibited by other applicable law; and

The safety and soundness of the requesting state trust company is not adversely affected.

A state trust company that intends to acquire, establish, or perform new activities through a subsidiary shall submit a letter to the commissioner describing in detail the proposed activities of the subsidiary.

The state trust company may acquire or establish a subsidiary or begin performing new activities in an existing subsidiary on the thirty-first day after the date the commissioner receives the state trust company’s letter, unless the commissioner specifies an earlier or later date. The commissioner may extend the thirty-day period of review on a determination that the state trust company’s letter raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period of review is extended, the state trust company may acquire or establish the subsidiary, or perform new activities in an existing subsidiary, only on prior written approval of the commissioner.

A subsidiary of a state trust company is subject to regulation by the commissioner to the extent provided by this article or rules or regulations adopted under this article. In the absence of limiting rules or regulations, the commissioner may regulate a subsidiary as if it were a state trust company.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-5.104.
Mutual funds.

A state trust company may invest for its own account in equity securities of an investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 USCS Section 80a-1 et seq.) and the Securities Act of 1933 (15 USCS Section 77a et seq.) if the portfolio of the investment company consists wholly of investments in which the state trust company could invest directly for its own account.

If the portfolio of an investment company described in subsection (a) of this section consists wholly of investments in which the state trust company could invest directly without limitation under Section 81-27-5.101(d), the state trust company may invest in the investment company without limitation.

If the portfolio of an investment company described in subsection (a) of this section contains any investment that is subject to the limits of Section 81-27-5.101(c), the state trust company may invest in the investment company not more than an amount equal to fifteen percent (15%) of the state trust company’s capital. This provision does not apply to a money market fund.

In evaluating investment limits under this article, a state trust company may not be required to combine:

The state trust company’s pro rata share of the securities of an issuer in the portfolio of an investment company with the state trust company’s pro rata share of the securities of that issuer held by another investment company in which the state trust company has invested; or

The state trust company’s own direct investment in the securities of an issuer with the state trust company’s pro rata share of the securities of that issuer held by each investment company in which the state trust company has invested under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-5.105.
Engaging in commerce prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, a state trust company may not invest its funds in trade or commerce by buying, selling, or otherwise dealing in goods or by owning or operating a business not part of the state trust business, except as necessary to fulfill a fiduciary obligation to a client.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.